ko: 표면 반사 특성: 무반사; 반사; 재귀반사; 기타
ja: 表面反射率: 非反射性; 反射式; 再帰反射性; その他
en: Surface reflectivity: Non-reflective; Reflective; Retroreflective; Other
bg-BG: Отражателна способност на повърхността: Неотразяващо; Светлоотразително; Светлоотразително; Друго
hr-HR: Refleksivnost površine: Nereflektirajuće; Reflektirajuće; Retroreflektirajuće; Ostalo
da: Overfladerefleksion: Ikke-reflekterende; Reflekterende; Retroreflekterende; Andet
it: Riflettività superficiale: Non riflettente; Riflettente; Retroriflettente; Altro
zh-CN: 表面反射率: 无反射; 反光; 反射; 其他
fi: Pinnan heijastavuus: Heijastamaton; Heijastava; Heijastava; Muu
sk-SK: Povrchová odrazivosť: Nereflexný; Reflexný; Retroreflexný; Iné
ru: Отражательная способность поверхности: Неотражающая; Светоотражающая; Светоотражающая; Другое
de: Oberflächenreflexion: Nicht reflektierend; Reflektierend; Retroreflektierend; Sonstiges
el: Ανακλαστικότητα επιφάνειας: Μη ανακλαστικό; Ανακλαστικό; Οπισθοανακλαστικό; Άλλο
sv: Ytreflektivitet: Icke-reflekterande; Reflekterande; Retroreflekterande; Annat
zh-TW: 表面反射率: 不反光; 反光; 反光; 其他
lt-LT: Paviršiaus atspindėjimas: Neatspindintis; Atspindintis šviesą; Atspindintis; Kita
pl: Odbicie powierzchniowe: Nierefleksyjny; Odblaskowe; Odblaskowy (retrorefleksyjny); Inne
nb: Overflatereflektivitet: Ikke-reflekterende; Reflekterende; Retroreflekterende; Annet
tr: Yüzey yansıtıcılığı: Yansıtıcı yapmayan; Yansıtıcı; Retroreflektif; Diğer
nl: Oppervlakte-reflectiviteit: Niet-reflecterend; Reflecterend; Retroreflecterend; Overig
pt-PT: Refletividade da superfície: Não refletor; Refletor; Retrorrefletor; Outro
th: การสะท้อนแสงของพื้นผิว: ไม่สะท้อนแสง; สะท้อนแสง; สะท้อนกลับ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Reflectivitatea suprafeței: Nereflectorizant; Reflectorizantă; Retroreflectorizant; Altele
sl-SI: Površinska odbojnost: Neodsevno; Odsevno; Retroreflektivno; Druga
hu: Felületi fényvisszaverő képesség: Nem tükröződő; Fényvisszaverő; Fényvisszaverő; Egyéb
es: Reflectividad de la superficie: No reflectante; Reflectante; Retrorreflectante; Otros
vi: Độ phản quang bề mặt: Không phản quang; Phản chiếu; Phản quang ngược; Khác
cs: Odrazivost povrchu: Nereflexní; Reflexní; Retroreflexní; Jiné
pt-BR: Refletividade da superfície: Não reflexivo; Refletivo; Retrorreflexivo; Outro
fr: Réflectivité de surface: Non réfléchissant; Réfléchissant; Rétroréfléchissant; Autre